District of Columbia statutes.
5-123.02

Use of unnecessary or wanton force.

Any officer who uses unnecessary and wanton severity in arresting or imprisoning any person shall be deemed guilty of assault and battery, and, upon conviction, punished therefor.

R.S., D.C., § 434
This section is referenced in § 5-302.
1981 Ed., § 4-176.
1973 Ed., § 4-176.